Hawaii statutes.
§350C-1 Findings and purposes. The
legislature finds that to obtain adoptive families for children with special
needs, states must assure prospective adoptive parents of substantial
assistance in meeting the high costs of supporting and providing for the
child's special needs. The purpose of this chapter is to authorize the
department of human services to enter into interstate agreements for the
protection of children who receive adoption assistance from the State. [L 1986,
c 110, pt of §1; am L 1987, c 339, §4]

Cross References

Adoption assistance program, see §§346-301 to 346-305.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next